Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-457
Law governing foreign limited liability partnership.

(1) The law under which a foreign limited liability partnership is formed governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership and the liability of partners for obligations of the partnership.

(2) A foreign limited liability partnership may not be denied a statement of foreign qualification by reason of any difference between the law under which the partnership was formed and the law of this state.

(3) A statement of foreign qualification does not authorize a foreign limited liability partnership to engage in any business or exercise any power that a partnership may not engage in or exercise in this state as a limited liability partnership.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 57.